Illinois, session 104th, HB2822.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Education Savings Account Act.  6    Section 5. Definitions. 7    "Eligible postsecondary institution" means a public 8community college, a public university, or an accredited 9private postsecondary institution.10    "Eligible student" means any elementary or secondary 11student who was eligible to attend a public school in this 12State in the preceding semester or is starting school in this 13State for the first time and who is a member of a household 14whose total annual income does not exceed an amount equal to 152.5 times the income standard used to qualify for a free or 16reduced-price lunch under the national free or reduced-price 17lunch program established under 42 U.S.C. 1751 et seq.18    "Parent" means a resident of this State who is a parent, 19guardian, custodian, or other person with the authority to act 20on behalf of the child.21    "Participating school" means any private school that 22provides education to elementary or secondary students and has 23notified the State Board of its intention to participate in   HB2822- 2 -LRB104 06556 LNS 16592 b1the Program and comply with the Program's requirements.2    "Private tutoring" means tutoring services provided by 3tutors accredited by a regional or national accrediting 4organization.5    "Program" means the Education Savings Account Program 6created in this Act.7    "Resident school district" means the public school 8district in which the student resides.9    "State Board" means the State Board of Education. 10    Section 10. Basic elements of the Program. 11    (a) The State Board shall create the Education Savings 12Account Program. The Program shall begin with the fall 13semester of the 2024-2025 school year.14    (b) A parent of an eligible student shall qualify for the 15State Board to make a grant to his or her child's Education 16Savings Account if the parent signs an agreement promising:17        (1) to provide an education for the eligible student 18    in at least the subjects of reading, grammar, mathematics, 19    social studies, and science; and20        (2) not to enroll their eligible student in a district 21    or charter school.22    (c) The State Board shall deposit into an Education 23Savings Account some or all of the State aid under Section 2418-8.15 of the School Code that would otherwise have been 25provided to the resident school district for the eligible   HB2822- 3 -LRB104 06556 LNS 16592 b1student had the student enrolled in the resident school 2district, as calculated under subsection (e) of this Section.3    (d) Parents participating in the Program shall agree to 4use the funds deposited in their eligible students' Education 5Savings Accounts for the following qualifying expenses to 6educate the eligible student:7        (1) Tuition and fees at a participating school.8        (2) Textbooks required by a participating school.9        (3) Payment to a licensed or accredited tutor.10        (4) Payment for the purchase of curriculum.11        (5) Tuition or fees for a non-public, online learning 12    program.13        (6) Fees for national, norm-referenced examinations, 14    Advanced Placement examinations or similar courses, and 15    any examinations related to college or university 16    admission.17        (7) Contribution to the eligible student's qualified 18    tuition program established pursuant to 26 U.S.C. 529.19        (8) Educational services for pupils with disabilities 20    from a licensed or accredited practitioner or provider.21        (9) Tuition and fees at an eligible postsecondary 22    institution.23        (10) Textbooks required for college or university 24    courses.25        (11) Fees for account management by private financial 26    management firms approved by the State Board.  HB2822- 4 -LRB104 06556 LNS 16592 b1    (e) Grant amounts to Education Savings Accounts shall be 2calculated according to the following schedule:3        (1) For students from households qualifying for the 4    federal free or reduced-price lunch program, the amount 5    granted to the student's Education Savings Account shall 6    be equal to the dollar amount the resident school district 7    would have received to serve and educate the eligible 8    student from State aid under Section 18-8.15 of the School 9    Code had the student enrolled there.10        (2) For students from households with an annual income 11    greater than the amount required to qualify for the 12    federal free or reduced-price lunch program but less than 13    1.5 times that amount, the amount granted to the student's 14    Education Savings Account shall be equal to 75% of the 15    dollar amount the resident school district would have 16    received to serve and educate the eligible student from 17    State aid under Section 18-8.15 of the School Code had the 18    student enrolled there.19        (3) For students from households with an annual income 20    of greater than 1.5 times the amount required to qualify 21    for the federal free or reduced-price lunch program but 22    less than 2 times that amount, the amount granted to the 23    student's Education Savings Account shall be equal to 50% 24    of the dollar amount the resident school district would 25    have received to serve and educate the eligible student 26    from State aid under Section 18-8.15 of the School Code   HB2822- 5 -LRB104 06556 LNS 16592 b1    had the student enrolled there.2        (4) For students from households with an annual income 3    of greater than 2 times the amount required to qualify for 4    the federal free or reduced-price lunch program but less 5    than 2.5 times that amount, the amount granted to the 6    student's Education Savings Account shall be equal to 25% 7    of the dollar amount the resident school district would 8    have received to serve and educate the eligible student 9    from State aid under Section 18-8.15 of the School Code 10    had the student enrolled there. 11    (f) A participating school, private tutor, eligible 12postsecondary institution, or other educational provider may 13not refund, rebate, or share a student's grant with the 14student's parent or the student in any manner. The funds in an 15Education Saving Account may be used only for educational 16purposes.17    (g) Parents shall be allowed to make payments for the 18costs of educational programs and services not covered by the 19funds in their accounts.20    (h) A participating student shall be counted in the 21enrollment figures for his or her resident school district for 22the purposes of calculating State aid to the resident school 23district under Section 18-8.15 of the School Code. The funds 24needed for a grant to an Education Savings Account shall be 25subtracted from the State aid payable to the student's 26resident school district under Section 18-8.15 of the School   HB2822- 6 -LRB104 06556 LNS 16592 b1Code. 2    Section 15. Administration of the Program. 3    (a) The State Board shall approve private financial 4management firms to manage Education Savings Accounts.5    (b) The State Board shall have the authority to conduct or 6contract for the auditing of accounts and shall, at a minimum, 7conduct random audits of accounts on an annual basis. The 8State Board shall have the authority to make any parent of an 9eligible student ineligible for the Program in the event of 10substantial misuse of the funds in the account.11    (c) The State Board shall have the authority to refer 12cases of substantial misuse of funds to law enforcement 13agencies for investigation if evidence of fraudulent use of an 14account is obtained.15    (d) The State Board shall provide parents of participating 16students with a written explanation of the allowable uses of 17Education Savings Accounts, the responsibilities of parents, 18and the duties of the State Board.19    (e) The State Board may deduct an amount from the grants to 20Education Savings Accounts to cover the costs of overseeing 21the accounts and administering the program, up to a limit of 223%.23    (f) The State Board shall establish reasonable fees for 24private financial management firms participating in the 25Program based upon market rates.  HB2822- 7 -LRB104 06556 LNS 16592 b1    (g) The State Board shall make payments to eligible 2students' Education Savings Accounts on a quarterly basis. 3    Section 20. Accountability standards for participating 4schools. 5    (a) To ensure that students are treated fairly and kept 6safe, all participating schools shall:7        (1) comply with all health and safety laws or codes 8    that apply to private schools;9        (2) hold a valid occupancy permit if required by their 10    local government;11        (3) certify that they comply with the 12    nondiscrimination policies set forth in 42 U.S.C. 1981; 13    and14        (4) conduct criminal history records checks on 15    employees. The participating school shall then:16            (A) exclude from employment any people not 17        permitted by State law to work in a private school; and18            (B) exclude from employment any people that might 19        reasonably pose a threat to the safety of students.20    (b) To ensure that funds are spent appropriately, all 21participating schools shall:22        (1) provide parents with a receipt for all qualifying 23    expenses at the school; and24        (2) demonstrate their financial viability by showing 25    they can repay any funds that might be provided from   HB2822- 8 -LRB104 06556 LNS 16592 b1    Education Savings Accounts, if they are to receive $50,000 2    or more during the school year, by:3            (A) filing with the State Board, prior to the 4        start of the school year, a surety bond payable to this 5        State in an amount equal to the aggregate amount of the 6        funds from Education Savings Accounts expected to be 7        paid during the school year from students admitted at 8        the participating school; or9            (B) filing with the State Board, prior to the 10        start of the school year, financial information that 11        demonstrates the school has the ability to pay an 12        aggregate amount equal to the amount of the funds from 13        Education Savings Accounts expected to be paid during 14        the school year to students admitted to the 15        participating school.16    (c) In order to allow parents and taxpayers to measure the 17achievements of the Program:18        (1) parents shall ensure that:19            (A) each year their eligible student takes either 20        State achievement tests or national, norm-referenced 21        tests that measure learning gains in mathematics and 22        language arts and provide for value-added assessment;23            (B) the results of these tests are provided to the 24        State Board or an organization chosen by the State 25        Board on an annual basis;26            (C) the student information is reported in a way   HB2822- 9 -LRB104 06556 LNS 16592 b1        that would allow the State Board to aggregate data by 2        grade level, gender, family income level, and race; 3        and4            (D) the State Board or an organization chosen by 5        the State Board will be informed of the eligible 6        student's graduation from high school; and 7        (2) the State Board or an organization chosen by the 8    State Board shall:9            (A) ensure compliance with all student privacy 10        laws;11            (B) collect all test results;12            (C) provide the test results, associated learning 13        gains, and graduation rates to the public, via the 14        State Board's Internet website, after the third year 15        of test and graduation-related data collection; the 16        findings shall be aggregated by the students' grade 17        level, gender, family income level, number of years of 18        participation in the Program, and race;19            (D) provide graduation rates to the public via the 20        State Board's Internet website after the third year of 21        test and test-related data collection; and22            (E) administer an annual parental satisfaction 23        survey that shall ask parents of students receiving 24        Education Savings Accounts to express: 25                (i) their satisfaction with the Program; and26                (ii) their opinions on other topics, items, or   HB2822- 10 -LRB104 06556 LNS 16592 b1            issues that the State Board finds would elicit 2            information about the effectiveness of the Program 3            and the number of years their child has 4            participated in the Program. 5    (d) A participating school is autonomous and not an agent 6of this State or the federal government, and, therefore:7        (1) the State Board or any other State agency may not 8    in any way regulate the educational program of a 9    participating school or education provider that accepts 10    funds from an Education Savings Account;11        (2) the creation of the Program does not expand the 12    regulatory authority of this State, its officers, or any 13    school district to impose any additional regulation of 14    private schools or education providers beyond those 15    necessary to enforce the requirements of the Program; and16        (3) participating schools and education providers 17    shall be given the maximum freedom to provide for the 18    educational needs of their students without governmental 19    control. 20    Section 25. Responsibilities of the State Board. 21    (a) The State Board shall ensure that eligible students 22and their parents are informed annually of which schools will 23be participating in the Program. Special attention shall be 24paid to ensuring that lower-income families are made aware of 25the program and their options.  HB2822- 11 -LRB104 06556 LNS 16592 b1    (b) The State Board shall create a standard form that 2parents of eligible students can submit to establish the 3student's eligibility for the Program. The State Board shall 4ensure that the application is readily available to interested 5families through various sources, including the Internet.6    (c) The State Board may bar a participating school or 7education provider from the Program if the State Board 8establishes that the participating school or education 9provider has:10        (1) routinely failed to comply with the accountability 11    standards established in Section 20 of this Act; or12        (2) failed to provide the eligible student with the 13    educational services funded by the Education Savings 14    Account.15    (d) If the State Board decides to bar a participating 16school or education provider from the program, the State Board 17shall notify eligible students and their parents of this 18decision as quickly as possible.19    (e) The State Board shall adopt rules and procedures as 20necessary for the administration of the Program. 21    Section 30. Responsibilities of resident school districts. 22    (a) The resident school district shall provide a 23participating school or education provider that has admitted 24an eligible student under the Program with a complete copy of 25the student's school records, while complying with the federal   HB2822- 12 -LRB104 06556 LNS 16592 b1Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974 (20 U.S.C. 21232g).3    (b) The resident school district shall provide 4transportation for an eligible student to and from the 5participating school or education provider under the same 6conditions as the resident school district is required to 7provide transportation for other resident students to and from 8private schools under the law. The resident school district 9shall qualify for State transportation aid for each student so 10transported.